Colorado statutes. TITLE 2 Legislative
PART 4
INTERFERENCE WITH THE LEGISLATIVE PROCESS

Cross references:

For legislative witnesses, see § 8-2.5-101.

2-2-401. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that in addition to the protections against interference with the legislative process afforded by the provisions of sections 18-4-401, 18-4-501, 18-8-102, 18-8-306, and 18-9-110, C.R.S., there is a need for legislation under which appropriate action may be taken to prevent the commission of acts prohibited under said sections.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 679, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-10-1.

2-2-402. Chief security officers.

Each house of the general assembly may appoint a chief security officer to ensure the orderly operation of each house and committees thereof. Such chief security officers shall perform the duties of the house employing them and shall be under the direction of one or more members or officers of such house as may be designated in the rules of each house.

Such chief security officers are hereby designated to be peace officers and shall have jurisdiction to act as such in the performance of their duties anywhere within the state.

Each house may adopt rules regarding the organization, supervision, and operations of its security staff, prescribing the qualifications, training, and duties of its security officers and all other matters relating to the performance of their responsibilities.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 679, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-10-2.

2-2-403. Indemnification of members, officers, and employees of the general assembly.

The state shall save harmless and indemnify all members, officers, and employees of the general assembly, either house thereof, or committees of the general assembly or either house thereof from financial loss arising out of any claim, demand, suit, or judgment by reason of alleged negligence or other act by such member, officer, or employee, as long as such member, officer, or employee at the time damages were sustained was performing duties relating to the maintenance of order in connection with the operation of the general assembly, either house thereof, or any committee of the general assembly or either house thereof, or involving the security, health, or safety of any member, officer, or employee of the general assembly, either house or a committee thereof, or the general public, and as long as such damage did not result from the willful and wrongful act or gross negligence of such member, officer, or employee; except that such member, officer, or employee shall, within five days after the time he is served with any summons, complaint, process, notice, demand, or pleading, deliver the original or a copy thereof to the attorney general.

Upon such delivery the attorney general may assume control of the representation of such member, officer, or employee. Such member, officer, or employee shall cooperate fully with the attorney general's defense.

This section shall not in any way impair, limit, or modify the rights or obligations of any insurer under any policy of insurance.

The benefits of this section shall inure only to such members, officers, and employees and shall not enlarge or diminish the rights of any other party.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 679, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-10-3.

2-2-404. Legislative rules.

The senate and the house of representatives shall each have the power to adopt rules or joint rules, or both, for the orderly conduct of their affairs and to preserve and protect the health, safety, and welfare of their members, officers, and employees in the performance of their official duties, as well as that of the general public in connection therewith, and to preserve and protect property and records under the jurisdiction of the general assembly or either house thereof, consistent with public convenience, the public's rights of freedom of expression and to peaceably assemble and petition government, and the established democratic concepts of the openness of the legislative process.

(1.5) Repealed.

In lieu of or in addition to the adoption of such rules, the senate and the house of representatives may each, by rule, authorize its presiding officer to promulgate regulations for any or all such purposes.

Rules or regulations may be adopted with respect to the following matters, among others, without limitation by reason of such specification:

Regulating admission to the legislative chambers, galleries, lobbies, offices, and other areas of the buildings wherein they are located which provide access thereto;

Limiting the size of groups of persons permitted within such areas, for reasons of health and safety and in case of fire or other emergency;

Prohibiting or restricting the bringing of signs, banners, placards, or other display materials into any such areas, or possessing them therein, without proper authorization;

Prohibiting or restricting the bringing of radio or television equipment, recording equipment, sound-making or amplifying equipment, and photographic equipment into any such areas, or possessing them therein, without proper authorization;

Prohibiting or restricting the bringing of packages, bags, baggage, or briefcases into any such areas, or possessing them therein, without proper authorization;

Establishing rules of conduct for visitors to the galleries;

Authorizing the clearing of the public from the chambers, lobbies, and galleries or from any room in which a public legislative hearing or meeting is being conducted in the event of any disturbance therein which disrupts legislative proceedings or endangers any member, officer, or employee of the general assembly or the general public, or where reasonable grounds exist for believing that such a disturbance or danger may occur; except that duly accredited representatives of the news media not participating in any such disturbance shall be permitted to remain therein. The closing of such areas to the public shall continue only so long as necessary to avoid disruption of the legislative proceedings or to preserve and protect the safety of the members, officers, or employees of the general assembly or the general public.

Authorizing the construction of safety barriers and other protective measures for the galleries and other areas under the jurisdiction of the general assembly and the acquisition of security equipment, all within the funds made available therefor;

Protecting the records and property of the general assembly from unlawful damage or destruction;

Any and all other matters which may be necessary or appropriate to the orderly conduct of the affairs of the general assembly and the protection of the health, safety, and welfare of the members, officers, and employees of the general assembly and the general public in connection therewith.

In lieu of or in addition to the adoption of separate rules, the senate and the house of representatives may adopt joint rules applicable to both houses.

In lieu of or in addition to the promulgation of separate regulations, the senate and the house of representatives may promulgate joint regulations applicable to both houses.

All such rules of the senate and the house of representatives or either house and regulations of the senate and the house of representatives shall be filed in the offices of the clerks thereof, and a copy of such rules and regulations shall be made available to any person upon request, without charge.

Such rules and regulations shall have the force and effect of law. Any person who willfully violates any such rule or regulation commits a petty offense.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 680, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-10-4.

L. 94:

(1.5) added, p. 1957, § 1, effective August 1.

L. 2006:

(1.5) repealed, p. 63, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(7) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3132, § 51, effective March 1, 2022.

2-2-405. Injunctions.

If the presiding officer of either the senate or the house of representatives has reasonable grounds for believing that any person is then committing an unlawful act, or is about to do so, which is interfering with or will interfere with any proceedings or other business of the general assembly, either house thereof, or any committee of the general assembly or either house thereof, he may seek injunctive relief in accordance with the Colorado rules of civil procedure.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 681, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-10-5.

2-2-406. Contempt of either house.

The senate and the house of representatives may each punish by imprisonment not extending beyond the same session of the general assembly, as and for a contempt, disorderly conduct of its members, officers, employees, or others committed in the immediate view of the senate or the house of representatives and tending to interrupt its proceedings. Imprisonment for contempt shall be effected by a warrant in the name of the people of the state, signed by the presiding officer of the house in which the contempt occurred, directed to the chief security officer of such house or the state police and ordering the apprehension of the contemnor and the delivery of him to the sheriff of the county in which the alleged contempt occurred for detention by said sheriff in accordance with such warrant, subject to such bail as may be set by the district court of the county in which the alleged contempt occurred. A finding of contempt and imprisonment therefor shall not constitute a bar to any other proceeding, civil or criminal, for the same act.

Notice of the proposed contempt citation shall be published in a resolution of the house in which the contempt occurred approved first by a majority of a committee and then of the house itself. If the contempt is committed before the house itself rather than a committee thereof, a resolution of the house itself shall be sufficient. Persons actually named in the resolution shall be either personally served or otherwise be given notice in the same manner as is provided by law and the Colorado rules of civil procedure for acquisition of jurisdiction over the person in civil actions. The notice shall include:

A statement of the terms or substance of the offense which caused the citation to be issued;

A statement of the time and place of the hearing before the committee which first passed the contempt resolution or before the house in which the contempt occurred, as the case may be. The person to be cited shall be required to show cause why he should not be found in contempt. The time and place for hearing shall allow reasonable time to give the person to be cited notice of the charges against him and to prepare an appropriate defense concerning them.

The contempt hearing shall give the person to be cited an opportunity for an oral presentation before the committee or before the house in which the contempt occurred, whichever is holding the hearing, for submission of written arguments, and for the right to counsel at the hearing.

A person to be cited shall be found in contempt and shall be punished therefor only after a majority of the committee which initiated the contempt proceeding finds, after notice and a hearing which satisfies the provisions of subsections (2) and (3) of this section, that the person cited has been proven beyond a reasonable doubt to have committed a contempt as defined in this section. The committee shall state in a report to the full house the reasons for its finding. If the full house affirms by a majority vote the finding of the committee, the cited person shall be held in contempt.

If the contempt citation is initiated by the house itself because of a contempt committed before the house, the person to be cited shall be punished for contempt if the house itself finds, by a majority vote, after notice and a hearing which satisfies the provisions of subsections (2) and (3) of this section, that the person cited has been proven beyond a reasonable doubt to have committed a contempt as defined in this section.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 682, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-10-6.